Utah statutes.
31A-25-303.   Standards pertaining to advertising and underwriting.
(1)  A third party administrator may use advertising pertaining to the
business underwritten by the insurer only to the extent it has been approved
in writing by the insurer in advance.
(2)  The agreement required under Subsection 31A-25-301 (1) shall include a
provision on underwriting or other standards pertaining to the business
underwritten by the insurer.
